Massachusetts, session 194th, S3099.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 1 of chapter 90B of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2024
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting the following new definition:-
“Wakesurfing activity” - an activity that involves using a surfboard, wakeboard or similar
device while being propelled by a motorboat's wake or while on or in a motorboat's wake
directly behind that motorboat
SECTION 2. Chapter 90B of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
inserting after section 9F the following new section:-
“Section 9G. A person may not operate a motorboat engaged in wakesurfing activity in
less than 15 feet of water or within 300 feet of the shoreline on waters of the commonwealth.
Any person engaging in wakesurfing activity must wear an approved personal flotation device.
The division of law enforcement within the department of fisheries and wildlife is hereby
of 2

authorized and directed to establish an educational safety program for the operation of
wakesurfing activity.
SECTION 3. Chapter 90B of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after
section 14 the following new section:-
“Section 14A. Any person who violates section 9G shall be subject to a civil fine as
follows: not more than $75 for a first offense; not more than $250 for a second offense; and not
more than $500 for a third or subsequent offense. Upon a third or subsequent violation, the
operator’s boating safety certificate shall be suspended, and the registration of the vessel used in
the wakesurfing activity shall be suspended for a period of 90 days.”
of 2